Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202657-1502
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 57-1501 to 57-1503:

(1) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment;

(2) Oil pipeline means a pipeline which is larger than eight inches in inside diameter and which is constructed in Nebraska for the transportation of petroleum, or petroleum components, products, or wastes, including crude oil or any fraction of crude oil, within, through, or across Nebraska, but does not include in-field and gathering lines; and

(3) Pipeline carrier means an individual, a company, a corporation, an association, or any other legal entity that engages in owning, operating, or managing an oil pipeline.

Laws 2011, First Spec. Sess., LB4, § 2;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 62;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 317.